Georgia, session 2025_26, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to education, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"20-1-12.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Foreign adversary' means a foreign government or foreign nongovernment person
designated as a foreign adversary by the United States Secretary of Commerce pursuant
to 15 C.F.R. Section 791.4 in effect on February 4, 2025.
- 1 -

LC 61 0185S
(2) 'Funding' means any gift, grant, donation, payment in exchange for services, capital
investment, salary, wage, compensation, fee, or other monetary exchange.
(3) 'Local education agency' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 20-2-167.1.
(4) 'Public postsecondary institution' means a school which is an institution of the
University System of Georgia or a unit of the Technical College System of Georgia.
(5) 'Public school' means any school under the control and management of a county,
independent, or area board of education supported by public funds; any school subject to
the provisions of Article 31 or 31A of Chapter 2 of this title supported by public funds;
or any school under the control and management of the State Board of Education or a
department or agency thereof supported by public funds.
(b) No public school, local education agency, or public postsecondary institution shall,
directly or indirectly, accept funding from or enter into a contract with a foreign adversary
or individuals or entities working on behalf of such foreign adversary."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -